Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, subdivision 34, is amended to read: Subd. 34. deleted text begin Precious metaldeleted text end Bullionnew text begin , coins, and currencynew text end . (a) deleted text begin Precious metal bullion is exempt. For purposes of this subdivision, "precious metal bullion" means bars or rounds that consist of 99.9 percent or more by weight of either gold, silver, platinum, or palladium and are marked with weight, purity, and contentdeleted text end new text begin Bullion, coins, and currency are exemptnew text end . new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "bullion" means bars, ingots, or commemorative medallions of gold, silver, platinum, palladium, rhodium, or a combination of these where the value of the metal depends on its content and not form; and new text end new text begin (2) "coins" and "currency" means a coin or currency made of gold, silver, or other metal or paper which is or has been used as legal tender. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The exemption under this subdivision does not apply to sales and purchases of jewelry, works of art, or scrap metal. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The intent of this subdivision is to eliminate the difference in tax treatment between the sale of precious metal bullionnew text begin and other forms of coins or currencynew text end and the sale of stock, bullion ETFs, bonds, and other investment instruments. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end